New York, session 2025-2026, A6587.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 239-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 239-c. Proof of disability for the purposes of accommodation. 1. The 4 regents shall establish a policy of accepting the following forms of 5 documentation as proof that a student or prospective student is an indi- 6 vidual with a disability, which shall include, but not be limited to: 7 (a) Documentation that such individual has had an Individualized 8 Education Program (IEP) under the Individuals with Disabilities Educa- 9 tion Act (IDEA) pursuant to part three hundred of title thirty-four of 10 the code of federal regulations, as such regulations may, from time to 11 time, be amended. A university may ask for additional documentation from 12 an individual who had an IEP but who was subsequently evaluated and 13 determined to be ineligible for services under the IDEA, including an 14 individual who was determined to be ineligible for such IEP during 15 elementary school. 16 (b) Documentation that such individual has received services or accom- 17 modations provided to such individual under a section 504 plan provided 18 to such individual pursuant to section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 19 1973. A university may ask for additional documentation, if needed, to 20 establish a reasonable accommodation. 21 (c) A plan or record of service for the individual from a private 22 school, a local educational agency, a state educational agency or an EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09629-01-5 A. 6587 2 1 institution of higher education provided in accordance with the Ameri- 2 cans with Disabilities Act. 3 (d) A record or evaluation from a relevant licensed professional find- 4 ing that the individual has a disability. 5 (e) A plan or record of disability from another institution of higher 6 education. 7 (f) Documentation of a disability due to service in the uniformed 8 services. 9 2. The regents shall provide such policy to students, faculty, and the 10 public in accessible formats, including during any student orientation, 11 and publicly posted on such university's website. 12 3. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a university under the 13 jurisdiction of the regents from establishing a less burdensome criteria 14 for determining whether an individual is an individual with a disabili- 15 ty. 16 § 2. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6235 to read 17 as follows: 18 § 6235. Proof of disability for the purposes of accommodation. 1. The 19 board of trustees shall establish a policy of accepting the following 20 forms of documentation as proof that a student or prospective student is 21 an individual with a disability, which shall include, but not be limited 22 to: 23 (a) Documentation that such individual has had an Individualized 24 Education Program (IEP) under the Individuals with Disabilities Educa- 25 tion Act (IDEA) pursuant to part three hundred of title thirty-four of 26 the code of federal regulations, as such regulations may, from time to 27 time, be amended. The city university may ask for additional documenta- 28 tion from an individual who had an IEP but who was subsequently evalu- 29 ated and determined to be ineligible for services under the IDEA, 30 including an individual who was determined to be ineligible for such IEP 31 during elementary school. 32 (b) Documentation that such individual has received services or accom- 33 modations provided to such individual under a section 504 plan provided 34 to such individual pursuant to section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 35 1973. The city university may ask for additional documentation, if need- 36 ed, to establish a reasonable accommodation. 37 (c) A plan or record of service for the individual from a private 38 school, a local educational agency, a state educational agency or an 39 institution of higher education provided in accordance with the Ameri- 40 cans with Disabilities Act. 41 (d) A record or evaluation from a relevant licensed professional find- 42 ing that the individual has a disability. 43 (e) A plan or record of disability from another institution of higher 44 education. 45 (f) Documentation of a disability due to service in the uniformed 46 services. 47 2. The board of trustees shall provide such policy to students, facul- 48 ty, and the public in accessible formats, including during any student 49 orientation, and publicly posted on the city university's website. 50 3. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the city university under 51 the jurisdiction of the board of trustees from establishing a less 52 burdensome criteria for determining whether an individual is an individ- 53 ual with a disability. 54 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.